Virginia statutes. Title 8.9A. Commercial Code — Secured Transactions.
Filing Office, Contents and Effectiveness of Financing Statement.

§ 8.9A-501.
Filing office.

Filing offices. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), if the local law of the Commonwealth governs perfection of a security interest or agricultural lien, the office in which to file a financing statement to perfect the security interest or agricultural lien is:

the office designated for the filing or recording of a record of a mortgage on the related real property, if:

the collateral is as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut; or

the financing statement is filed as a fixture filing and the collateral is goods that are or are to become fixtures; or

the office of the State Corporation Commission or any office duly authorized by it, in all other cases, including a case in which the collateral is goods that are or are to become fixtures and the financing statement is not filed as a fixture filing.

Filing office for transmitting utilities. The office in which to file a financing statement to perfect a security interest in collateral, including fixtures, of a transmitting utility is the office of the State Corporation Commission. The financing statement also constitutes a fixture filing as to the collateral indicated in the financing statement which is or is to become fixtures.

History.

1996, c. 216, § 8.9-401; 2000, c. 1007.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1527 (1971).

for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1183 (1972).

for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1426 (1973).

for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1668 (1975).

for the year 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 523 (1989).

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

For comment, “Obtaining and Enforcing a Security Interest in Local Currency Under Article 9 of the UCC,” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 769 (2019).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 18. Enforcement of Judgments and Decrees. § 18.03 Equity. Bryson.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 3. The Writ Firea Facies: Execution. § 3.5 Property Subject to Execution. Rendleman.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-803. Security Agreement; Financing Statements.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments, § 17; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 3, 5, 8, 11, 12, 36.

§ 8.9A-502.
Contents of financing statement; record of mortgage as financing statement; time of filing financing statement.

Sufficiency of financing statement. Subject to subsection (b), a financing statement is sufficient only if it:

provides the name of the debtor;

provides the name of the secured party or a representative of the secured party; and

indicates the collateral covered by the financing statement.

Real-property-related financing statements. Except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-501 (b)

, to be sufficient, a financing statement that covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut, or which is filed as a fixture filing and covers goods that are or are to become fixtures, must satisfy subsection (a) and also:

indicate that it covers this type of collateral;

indicate that it is to be filed for record in the real property records;

provide a description of the real property to which the collateral is related sufficient to give constructive notice of a mortgage under the law of this state if the description were contained in a record of the mortgage of the real property; and

if the debtor does not have an interest of record in the real property, provide the name of a record owner.

Record of mortgage as financing statement. A record of a mortgage is effective, from the date of recording, as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing or as a financing statement covering as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut only if:

the record indicates the goods or accounts that it covers;

the goods are or are to become fixtures related to the real property described in the record or the collateral is related to the real property described in the record and is as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut;

the record satisfies the requirements for a financing statement in this section, but:

the record need not indicate that it is to be filed in the real property records; and

the record sufficiently provides the name of a debtor who is an individual if it provides the individual name of the debtor or the surname and first personal name of the debtor, even if the debtor is an individual to whom §

8.9A-503(a)(4)

applies; and

the record is duly recorded.

Filing before security agreement or attachment. A financing statement may be filed before a security agreement is made or a security interest otherwise attaches.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-402; 1966, c. 649; 1973, c. 509; 1976, c. 536; 1977, c. 539; 1978, cc. 284, 285; 1982, c. 652; 1999, c. 96; 2000, c. 1007; 2012, c. 155.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 155, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote subdivision (c)(3).

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1183 (1972).

for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1426 (1973).

For article, “Revamping Consumer-Credit Contract Law,” see 68 Va. L. Rev. 1333 (1982).

For survey on commercial law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 523 (1989).

For 1991 survey of commercial law, see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 681 (1991).

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 97.1, 101.4.

§ 8.9A-503.
Name of debtor and secured party.

Sufficiency of debtor’s name. A financing statement sufficiently provides the name of the debtor:

except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3), if the debtor is a registered organization or the collateral is held in a trust that is a registered organization, only if the financing statement provides the name that is stated to be the registered organization’s name on the public organic record most recently filed with or issued or enacted by the registered organization’s jurisdiction of organization which purports to state, amend, or restate the registered organization’s name;

subject to subsection (f), if the collateral is being administered by the personal representative of a decedent, only if the financing statement provides, as the name of the debtor, the name of the decedent and, in a separate part of the financing statement, indicates that the collateral is being administered by a personal representative;

if the collateral is held in a trust that is not a registered organization, only if the financing statement:

provides, as the name of the debtor:

if the organic record of the trust specifies a name for the trust, the name specified; or

if the organic record of the trust does not specify a name for the trust, the name of the settlor or testator; and

in a separate part of the financing statement:

if the name is provided in accordance with subparagraph (A)(i), indicates that the collateral is held in trust; or

if the name is provided in accordance with subparagraph (A)(ii), provides additional information sufficient to distinguish the trust from other trusts having one or more of the same settlors or the same testator and indicates that the collateral is held in a trust, unless the additional information so indicates;

subject to subsection (g), if the debtor is an individual to whom the Commonwealth has issued a driver’s license or other document under Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of Title 46.2 that has not expired, only if it provides the name of the individual which is indicated on the driver’s license or other document;

if the debtor is an individual to whom paragraph (4) does not apply, only if it provides the individual name of the debtor or the surname and first personal name of the debtor; and

in other cases:

if the debtor has a name, only if it provides the organizational name of the debtor; and

if the debtor does not have a name, only if it provides the names of the partners, members, associates, or other persons comprising the debtor, in a manner that each name provided would be sufficient if the person named were the debtor.

Additional debtor-related information. A financing statement that provides the name of the debtor in accordance with subsection (a) is not rendered ineffective by the absence of:

a trade name or other name of the debtor; or

unless required under subsection (a)(6)(B), names of partners, members, associates, or other persons comprising the debtor.

Debtor’s trade name insufficient. A financing statement that provides only the debtor’s trade name does not sufficiently provide the name of the debtor.

Representative capacity. Failure to indicate the representative capacity of a secured party or representative of a secured party does not affect the sufficiency of a financing statement.

Multiple debtors and secured parties. A financing statement may provide the name of more than one debtor and the name of more than one secured party.

Name of decedent. The name of the decedent indicated on the order appointing the personal representative of the decedent issued by the court having jurisdiction over the collateral is sufficient as the “name of the decedent” under subsection (a)(2).

Multiple driver’s licenses. If the Commonwealth has issued to an individual more than one driver’s license or other document of a kind described in subsection (a)(4), the one that was issued most recently is the one to which subsection (a)(4) refers.

Definition. In this section, the “name of the settlor or testator” means:

if the settlor is a registered organization, the name of the registered organization indicated on the public organic record filed with or issued or enacted by the registered organization’s jurisdiction of organization; or

in other cases, the name of the settlor or testator indicated in the trust’s organic record.

History.

2000, c. 1007; 2009, cc. 217, 610; 2012, c. 155; 2020, cc. 1227, 1246.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 217 and 610 are nearly identical, and in subsection (a), added subdivision (a) (4), redesignated former subdivision (a) (4) as (5), and made related changes; and added subsection (f).

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 155, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1227 and 1246, effective January 1, 2021, are identical, and in subdivision (a)(4), substituted “other document under Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of” for “identification card pursuant to” and “other document” for “identification card”; and substituted “other document” for “identification card” in subsection (g).

Law Review.

For article, “The Recent Amendments to UCC Article 9: Problems and Solutions,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1009 (2011).

§ 8.9A-504.
Indication of collateral.

A financing statement sufficiently indicates the collateral that it covers if the financing statement provides:

a description of the collateral pursuant to §

8.9A-108

; or

an indication that the financing statement covers all assets or all personal property.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-402; 1966, c. 649; 1973, c. 509; 1976, c. 536; 1977, c. 539; 1978, cc. 284, 285; 1982, c. 652; 1999, c. 96; 2000, c. 1007.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

§ 8.9A-505.
Filing and compliance with other statutes and treaties for consignments, leases, other bailments, and other transactions.

Use of terms other than “debtor” and “secured party.” A consignor, lessor, or other bailor of goods, a licensor, or a buyer of a payment intangible or promissory note may file a financing statement, or may comply with a statute or treaty described in §

8.9A-311 (a)

, using the terms “consignor,” “consignee,” “lessor,” “lessee,” “bailor,” “bailee,” “licensor,” “licensee,” “owner,” “registered owner,” “buyer,” “seller,” or words of similar import, instead of the terms “secured party” and “debtor.”

Effect of financing statement under subsection (a). This part applies to the filing of a financing statement under subsection (a) and, as appropriate, to compliance that is equivalent to filing a financing statement under §

8.9A-311 (b)

, but the filing or compliance is not of itself a factor in determining whether the collateral secures an obligation. If it is determined for another reason that the collateral secures an obligation, a security interest held by the consignor, lessor, bailor, licensor, owner, or buyer which attaches to the collateral is perfected by the filing or compliance.

History.

1973, c. 509, § 8.9-408; 2000, c. 1007.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1426 (1973).

§ 8.9A-506.
Effect of errors or omissions.

Minor errors and omissions. A financing statement substantially satisfying the requirements of this part is effective, even if it has minor errors or omissions, unless the errors or omissions make the financing statement seriously misleading.

Financing statement seriously misleading. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), a financing statement that fails sufficiently to provide the name of the debtor in accordance with §

8.9A-503 (a)

is seriously misleading.

Financing statement not seriously misleading. If a search of the records of the filing office under the debtor’s correct name, using the filing office’s standard search logic, if any, would disclose a financing statement that fails sufficiently to provide the name of the debtor in accordance with §

8.9A-503 (a)

, the name provided does not make the financing statement seriously misleading.

“Debtor’s correct name.” For purposes of §

8.9A-508 (b)

, the “debtor’s correct name” in subsection (c) means the correct name of the new debtor.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-402; 1966, c. 649; 1973, c. 509; 1976, c. 536; 1977, c. 539; 1978, cc. 284, 285; 1982, c. 652; 1999, c. 96; 2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-507.
Effect of certain events on effectiveness of financing statement.

Disposition. A filed financing statement remains effective with respect to collateral that is sold, exchanged, leased, licensed, or otherwise disposed of and in which a security interest or agricultural lien continues, even if the secured party knows of or consents to the disposition.

Information becoming seriously misleading. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) and §

8.9A-508

, a financing statement is not rendered ineffective if, after the financing statement is filed, the information provided in the financing statement becomes seriously misleading under §

8.9A-506

.

Change in debtor’s name. If the name that a filed financing statement provides for a debtor becomes insufficient as the name of the debtor under §

8.9A-503(a)

so that the financing statement becomes seriously misleading under §

8.9A-506

:

the financing statement is effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the debtor before, or within four months after, the filed financing statement becomes seriously misleading; and

the financing statement is not effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the debtor more than four months after the filed financing statement becomes seriously misleading, unless an amendment to the financing statement which renders the financing statement not seriously misleading is filed within four months after that event.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-402; 1966, c. 649; 1973, c. 509; 1976, c. 536; 1977, c. 539; 1978, cc. 284, 285; 1982, c. 652; 1999, c. 96; 2000, c. 1007; 2012, c. 155.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 155, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote subsection (c).

§ 8.9A-508.
Effectiveness of financing statement if new debtor becomes bound by security agreement.

Financing statement naming original debtor. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a filed financing statement naming an original debtor is effective to perfect a security interest in collateral in which a new debtor has or acquires rights to the extent that the financing statement would have been effective had the original debtor acquired rights in the collateral.

Financing statement becoming seriously misleading. If the difference between the name of the original debtor and that of the new debtor causes a filed financing statement that is effective under subsection (a) to be seriously misleading under §

8.9A-506

:

the financing statement is effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the new debtor before, and within four months after, the new debtor becomes bound under §

8.9A-203 (d)

; and

the financing statement is not effective to perfect a security interest in collateral acquired by the new debtor more than four months after the new debtor becomes bound under §

8.9A-203 (d)

unless an initial financing statement providing the name of the new debtor is filed before the expiration of that time.

When section not applicable. This section does not apply to collateral as to which a filed financing statement remains effective against the new debtor under §

8.9A-507 (a)

.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-509.
Persons entitled to file a record.

Person entitled to file record. A person may file an initial financing statement, amendment that adds collateral covered by a financing statement, or amendment that adds a debtor to a financing statement only if:

the debtor authorizes the filing in an authenticated record or pursuant to subsection (b) or (c); or

the person holds an agricultural lien that has become effective at the time of filing and the financing statement covers only collateral in which the person holds an agricultural lien.

Security agreement as authorization. By authenticating or becoming bound as debtor by a security agreement, a debtor or new debtor authorizes the filing of an initial financing statement, and an amendment, covering:

the collateral described in the security agreement; and

property that becomes collateral under §

8.9A-315 (a)

(2), whether or not the security agreement expressly covers proceeds.

Acquisition of collateral as authorization. By acquiring collateral in which a security interest or agricultural lien continues under §

8.9A-315 (a)

(1), a debtor authorizes the filing of an initial financing statement, and an amendment, covering the collateral and property that becomes collateral under §

8.9A-315 (a)

(2).

Person entitled to file certain amendments. A person may file an amendment other than an amendment that adds collateral covered by a financing statement or an amendment that adds a debtor to a financing statement only if:

the secured party of record authorizes the filing; or

the amendment is a termination statement for a financing statement as to which the secured party of record has failed to file or send a termination statement as required by §

8.9A-513 (a)

or (c), the debtor authorizes the filing, and the termination statement indicates that the debtor authorized it to be filed.

Multiple secured parties of record. If there is more than one secured party of record for a financing statement, each secured party of record may authorize the filing of an amendment under subsection (d).

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-510.
Effectiveness of filed record.

Filed record effective if authorized. A filed record is effective only to the extent that it was filed by a person that may file it under §

8.9A-509

.

Authorization by one secured party of record. A record authorized by one secured party of record does not affect the financing statement with respect to another secured party of record.

Continuation statement not timely filed. A continuation statement that is not filed within the six-month period prescribed by §

8.9A-515 (d)

is ineffective.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-511.
Secured party of record.

Secured party of record. A secured party of record with respect to a financing statement is a person whose name is provided as the name of the secured party or a representative of the secured party in an initial financing statement that has been filed. If an initial financing statement is filed under §

8.9A-514 (a)

, the assignee named in the initial financing statement is the secured party of record with respect to the financing statement.

Amendment naming secured party of record. If an amendment of a financing statement which provides the name of a person as a secured party or a representative of a secured party is filed, the person named in the amendment is a secured party of record. If an amendment is filed under §

8.9A-514 (b)

, the assignee named in the amendment is a secured party of record.

Amendment deleting secured party of record. A person remains a secured party of record until the filing of an amendment of the financing statement which deletes the person.

History.

2000, c. 1007.

§ 8.9A-512.
Amendment of financing statement.

Amendment of information in financing statement. Subject to §

8.9A-509

, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or, subject to subsection (e), otherwise amend the information provided in, a financing statement by filing an amendment that:

identifies, by its file number, the initial financing statement to which the amendment relates; and

if the amendment relates to an initial financing statement filed or recorded in a filing office described in §

8.9A-501 (a)

(1), provides the information specified in §

8.9A-502 (b)

.

Period of effectiveness not affected. Except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-515

, the filing of an amendment does not extend the period of effectiveness of the financing statement.

Effectiveness of amendment adding collateral. A financing statement that is amended by an amendment that adds collateral is effective as to the added collateral only from the date of the filing of the amendment.

Effectiveness of amendment adding debtor. A financing statement that is amended by an amendment that adds a debtor is effective as to the added debtor only from the date of the filing of the amendment.

Certain amendments ineffective. An amendment is ineffective to the extent it:

purports to delete all debtors and fails to provide the name of a debtor to be covered by the financing statement; or

purports to delete all secured parties of record and fails to provide the name of a new secured party of record.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-402; 1966, c. 649; 1973, c. 509; 1976, c. 536; 1977, c. 539; 1978, cc. 284, 285; 1982, c. 652; 1999, c. 96; 2000, c. 1007.

Editor’s note.

The uniform act contains two alternatives for subdivision (a) of this section. Virginia adopted alternative A.
Alternative B reads:

“(a) Amendment of information in financing statement. Subject to Section 9-509, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or, subject to subsection (e), otherwise amend the information provided in, a financing statement by filing an amendment that:

“(1) identifies, by its file number, the initial financing statement to which the amendment relates; and

“(2) if the amendment relates to an initial financing statement filed [or recorded] in a filing office described in Section 9-501 (a) (1), provides the date [and time] that the initial financing statement was filed [or recorded] and the information specified in Section 9-502 (b).”

§ 8.9A-513.
Termination statement.

Consumer goods. A secured party shall cause the secured party of record for a financing statement to file a termination statement for the financing statement if the financing statement covers consumer goods and:

there is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value; or

the debtor did not authorize the filing of the initial financing statement.

Time for compliance with subsection (a). To comply with subsection (a), a secured party shall cause the secured party of record to file the termination statement:

within one month after there is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value; or

if earlier, within twenty days after the secured party receives an authenticated demand from a debtor.

Other collateral. In cases not governed by subsection (a), within twenty days after a secured party receives an authenticated demand from a debtor, the secured party shall cause the secured party of record for a financing statement to send to the debtor a termination statement for the financing statement or file the termination statement in the filing office if:

except in the case of a financing statement covering accounts or chattel paper that has been sold or goods that are the subject of a consignment, there is no obligation secured by the collateral covered by the financing statement and no commitment to make an advance, incur an obligation, or otherwise give value;

the financing statement covers accounts or chattel paper that has been sold but as to which the account debtor or other person obligated has discharged its obligation;

the financing statement covers goods that were the subject of a consignment to the debtor but are not in the debtor’s possession; or

the debtor did not authorize the filing of the initial financing statement.

Effect of filing termination statement. Except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-510

, upon the filing of a termination statement with the filing office, the financing statement to which the termination statement relates ceases to be effective. Except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-510

, for purposes of §§

8.9A-519 (g)

,

8.9A-522 (a)

, and

8.9A-523 (c)

, the filing with the filing office of a termination statement relating to a financing statement that indicates that the debtor is a transmitting utility also causes the effectiveness of the financing statement to lapse.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-404; 1973, c. 509; 1975, c. 225; 1977, c. 539; 1982, c. 652; 1984, cc. 40, 771; 1988, c. 804; 1990, c. 412; 2000, c. 1007.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 97.1, 101.4.

§ 8.9A-514.
Assignment of powers of secured party of record.

Assignment reflected on initial financing statement. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), an initial financing statement may reflect an assignment of all of the secured party’s power to authorize an amendment to the financing statement by providing the name and mailing address of the assignee as the name and address of the secured party.

Assignment of filed financing statement. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), a secured party of record may assign of record all or part of its power to authorize an amendment to a financing statement by filing in the filing office an amendment of the financing statement which:

identifies, by its file number, the initial financing statement to which it relates;

provides the name of the assignor; and

provides the name and mailing address of the assignee.

Assignment of record of mortgage. An assignment of record of a security interest in a fixture covered by a record of a mortgage which is effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing under §

8.9A-502 (c)

may be made only by an assignment of record of the mortgage in the manner provided by law of the Commonwealth other than the Uniform Commercial Code.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 43-55,

43-65

; 1964, c. 219, § 8.9-405; 1973, c. 509; 1975, c. 225; 1977, c. 539; 1978, c. 284; 1982, c. 652; 1984, c. 771; 1988, c. 804; 1990, c. 412; 1992, c. 784; 2000, c. 1007.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Assignments, § 29.

§ 8.9A-515.
Duration and effectiveness of financing statement; effect of lapsed financing statement.

Five-year effectiveness. Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b), (e), (f), and (g), a filed financing statement is effective for a period of five years after the date of filing.

Public-finance or manufactured-home transaction. Except as otherwise provided in subsections (e), (f), and (g), an initial financing statement filed in connection with a public-finance transaction or manufactured-home transaction is effective for a period of thirty years after the date of filing if it indicates that it is filed in connection with a public-finance transaction or manufactured-home transaction.

Lapse and continuation of financing statement. The effectiveness of a filed financing statement lapses on the expiration of the period of its effectiveness unless before the lapse a continuation statement is filed pursuant to subsection (d). Upon lapse, a financing statement ceases to be effective and any security interest or agricultural lien that was perfected by the financing statement becomes unperfected, unless the security interest is perfected otherwise. If the security interest or agricultural lien becomes unperfected upon lapse, it is deemed never to have been perfected as against a purchaser of the collateral for value.

When continuation statement may be filed. A continuation statement may be filed only within six months before the expiration of the five-year period specified in subsection (a) or the thirty-year period specified in subsection (b), whichever is applicable.

Effect of filing continuation statement. Except as otherwise provided in §

8.9A-510

, upon timely filing of a continuation statement, the effectiveness of the initial financing statement continues for a period of five years commencing on the day on which the financing statement would have become ineffective in the absence of the filing. Upon the expiration of the five-year period, the financing statement lapses in the same manner as provided in subsection (c), unless, before the lapse, another continuation statement is filed pursuant to subsection (d). Succeeding continuation statements may be filed in the same manner to continue the effectiveness of the initial financing statement.

Transmitting utility financing statement. If a debtor is a transmitting utility and a filed initial financing statement so indicates, the financing statement is effective until a termination statement is filed.

Record of mortgage as financing statement. A record of a mortgage that is effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing under §

8.9A-502 (c)

remains effective as a financing statement filed as a fixture filing until the mortgage is released or satisfied of record or its effectiveness otherwise terminates as to the real property.

History.

1964, c. 219, § 8.9-403; 1973, c. 509; 1975, c. 225; 1976, c. 536; 1977, c. 539; 1978, c. 284; 1982, c. 652; 1984, cc. 40, 771; 1985, c. 297; 1988, c. 804; 1990, cc. 89, 412; 1992, c. 784; 2000, c. 1007; 2012, c. 155.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 155, effective July 1, 2013, inserted “initial” preceding “financing statement” in the first sentence of subsection (f).

§ 8.9A-516.
What constitutes filing; effectiveness of filing.

What constitutes filing. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), communication of a record to a filing office and tender of the filing fee or acceptance of the record by the filing office constitutes filing.

Refusal to accept record; filing does not occur. Filing does not occur with respect to a record that a filing office refuses to accept because:

the record is not communicated by a method or medium of communication authorized by the filing office;

an amount equal to or greater than the applicable filing fee is not tendered;

the filing office is unable to index the record because:

in the case of an initial financing statement, the record does not provide a name for the debtor;

in the case of an amendment or information statement, the record:

does not identify the initial financing statement as required by §

8.9A-512

or

8.9A-518

, as applicable;

identifies an initial financing statement whose effectiveness has lapsed under §

8.9A-515

; or

in the case of a record filed or recorded in the filing office described in §

8.9A-501(a)(1)

, does not provide the name and mailing address of the debtor;

in the case of an initial financing statement that provides the name of a debtor identified as an individual or an amendment that provides a name of a debtor identified as an individual which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the record relates, the record does not identify the debtor’s surname; or

in the case of a record filed or recorded in the filing office described in §

8.9A-501(a)(1)

, the record does not provide a sufficient description of the real property to which it relates;

in the case of an initial financing statement or an amendment that adds a secured party of record, the record does not provide a name and mailing address for the secured party of record;

in the case of an initial financing statement or an amendment that provides a name of a debtor which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the amendment relates, the record does not:

provide a mailing address for the debtor; or

indicate whether the name provided as the name of the debtor is the name of an individual or an organization;

in the case of an assignment reflected in an initial financing statement under §

8.9A-514(a)

or an amendment filed under §

8.9A-514(b)

, the record does not provide a name and mailing address for the assignee;

in the case of a continuation statement, the record is not filed within the six-month period prescribed by §

8.9A-515(d)

; or

in the case of an initial financing statement or amendment communicated to the office of the State Corporation Commission, it appears to such office that the record:

is not created pursuant to this title;

is presented for filing for an improper purpose, such as to hinder, harass, or otherwise wrongfully interfere with a person or promote or conduct an illegitimate object or purpose;

is materially false or fraudulent; or

indicates that the debtor and the secured party are substantially the same person or that an individual debtor is a transmitting utility.

Rules applicable to subsection (b). For purposes of subsection (b):

a record does not provide information if the filing office is unable to read or decipher the information;

a record that does not indicate that it is an amendment or identify an initial financing statement to which it relates, as required by §

8.9A-512

,

8.9A-514

, or

8.9A-518

, is an initial financing statement; and

if the filing office becomes aware that a record may have been wrongfully filed because it should have been rejected under subdivision (b)(8), the filing office may review the record and relevant circumstances and, if it determines that the record was wrongfully filed and should have been rejected under subdivision (b)(8):

the record shall be deemed void and ineffective; and

the filing office shall remove the record from the index and communicate the foregoing to the person that presented the wrongfully filed record and to other persons, as appropriate.

Refusal to accept record; record effective as filed record. A record that is communicated to the filing office with tender of the filing fee, but which the filing office refuses to accept for a reason other than one set forth in subsection (b), is effective as a filed record except as against a purchaser of the collateral which gives value in reasonable reliance upon the absence of the record from the files.

History.

2000, c. 1007; 2002, cc. 566, 644; 2012, c. 155; 2013, c. 757.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 566 and 644, are identical, and deleted “or” from the end of subdivision (b) (3) (B) (i); added “or” to the end of subdivision (b) (3) (B) (ii); and added subdivision (b) (3) (B) (iii).

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 155, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “or information statement” for “or correction statement” in subdivision (b) (3) (B), substituted “debtor’s surname; or” for “debtor’s last name; or” at the end of subdivision (b) (3) (C), rewrote subdivision (b) (5), and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 757 added subdivisions (b)(8) and (c)(3), and made related changes.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1426 (1973).

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 97.1, 101.4.

§ 8.9A-517.
Effect of indexing errors.

The failure of the filing office to index a record correctly does not affect the effectiveness of the filed record.

History.

2000, c. 1007.